lexc-files/derivational-suffixes/verb-suffixing/verb-derivSuffix_finalE.txt
!=====================
LEXICON InterProgFutII
!=====================
0:0                                            FutureFrustrativeII;
^@~%:(ng)igate(V→V):^%{.f.%}iga%{t%}e**        EvidentialImputativeVI; ! to never V; to not be V-ing at the present time
^@laaghigate(V→V):^laaghiga%{t%}e**            EvidentialImputativeVI; ! to seldom V; to infrequently V; to not V enough; inadequately V
^–pagigate(V→V):^pagiga%{t%}e**                EvidentialImputativeVI; ! to V infrequently; to seldom V 
^–qiigate(V→V):^qiiga%{t%}e**                  EvidentialImputativeVI; ! to never briefly V
^~%:(ng)ite(V→V):^%{.f.%}ngi%{t%}e**           EvidentialImputativeVI; ! to lack the quality of V 
^–pagite(V→V):^pagi%{t%}e**                    EvidentialImputativeVI; ! for there not to be much V-ness
^–ketiite(V→V):^ketii%{t%}e**                  EvidentialImputativeVI; ! to not tend to V 
^–llgite(V→V):^llgi%{t%}e**                    EvidentialImputativeVI; ! to V poorly
^–llgiite(V→V):^llgii%{t%}e**                  EvidentialImputativeVI; ! to become a poor V-er
^@~%:(i/u)mangite(V→V):^%{.f.%}umangi%{t%}e**  EvidentialImputativeVI; ! to not have V-ed
^–pagumangite(V→V):^pagumangi%{t%}e**          EvidentialImputativeVI; ! to not have V-ed so much
^@~fniite(V→V):^%{.f.%}nii%{t%}e**             EvidentialImputativeVI; ! to not cause one to V
^@~fnaanghite(V→V):^%{.f.%}naanghi%{t%}e*      EvidentialImputativeVI; ! to not V in the future; won't V
^–pagnaanghite(V→V):^pagnaanghi%{t%}e**        EvidentialImputativeVI; ! to not V too much, very much in the future 
^@–nghite(V→V):^nghi%{t%}e**                   EvidentialImputativeVI; ! to not V
^+panghite(V→V):^panghi%{t%}e**                EvidentialImputativeVI; ! to insufficiently V; to not V enough
^–panghite(V→V):^panghi%{t%}e**                EvidentialImputativeVI; ! to insufficiently V; to not V enough
^+pagunghite(V→V):^pagunghi%{t%}e**            EvidentialImputativeVI; ! to not be sufficiently V
^–pagunghite(V→V):^pagunghi%{t%}e**            EvidentialImputativeVI; ! to not be sufficiently V
^–llghite(V→V):^llghi%{t%}e**                  EvidentialImputativeVI; ! to not V
^+pagningite(V→V):^pagningi%{t%}e**            EvidentialImputativeVI; ! to not be able to V; cannot V
^+yaghqiite(V→V):^yaghqii%{t%}e**              EvidentialImputativeVI; ! to not to have to V
^@~f–yiite(V→V):^%{.f.%}yii%{t%}e**            EvidentialImputativeVI; ! to poorly V habitually
^+yugniite(V→V):^yugnii%{t%}e**                EvidentialImputativeVI; ! to not find it easy to V; to not want to V
^@~fnanigh(V→V):^%{.f.%}nanigh                 EvidentialImputativeIV; ! to cease V-ing; to stop V-ing; to quit V-ing
^@~fnanighqe(V→V):^%{.f.%}nanighqe             EvidentialImputativeII; ! to make one cease V-ing


!==========================
LEXICON FutureFrustrativeII
!==========================
0:0                           EvidentialImputativeII;
^@lleqe(V→V):^lleqe           EvidentialImputativeII; ! to V in the future; will V
^@~fnaagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}naagh  EvidentialImputativeIV; ! to be going to V eventually
^@~fyagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}yagh    EvidentialImputativeIV; ! to V but...; to V in vain; to V without the desired results 


!=============================
LEXICON EvidentialImputativeII
!=============================
0:0                             VerbInflII;
^+(pete)fte(V→V):^f%{t%}e       VerbInflV;  ! to evidently V or have V-ed
^+yengagh(V→V):^yengagh         VerbInflI;  ! it loks like V (from the evidence I have heard or seen)
^@~fni(CmpdVbl):^%{.f.%}ni      VerbInflI;  ! to say that one is V-ing or being V-ed; to think that one is V-ing or being V-ed
^@~fyuke(CmpdVbl):^%{.f.%}yuke  VerbInflII; ! to think that one is V-ing or has V-ed
^@~fnayuke(V→V):^%{.f.%}nayuke  VerbInflII; ! to think that one might V
